Utah statutes.
48-2a-908 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Action by director of division.

The director of the division may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this Article.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

